District of Columbia statutes.
47-3410

Effect of District of Columbia Tax Enforcement Act of 1982.

(a)

If any provision of the District of Columbia Tax Enforcement Act of 1982, including any amendment made by the District of Columbia Tax Enforcement Act of 1982, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, the remainder of the District of Columbia Tax Enforcement Act of 1982, including the remaining amendments, and the application of such provisions to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected thereby.

(b)

The repeal or amendment by the District of Columbia Tax Enforcement Act of 1982 of any provision of law shall not affect any act done or any right accrued or accruing under such provision of law before July 24, 1982, or any suit or proceeding had or commenced before July 24, 1982, but all such rights and liabilities under such acts shall continue and may be enforced in the same manner and to the same extent, as if such repeal or amendment had not been made.

(c)

All offenses committed, and all penalties incurred, prior to July 24, 1982, under any provisions of law repealed or amended, may be prosecuted and punished in the same manner and with the same effect as if the District of Columbia Tax Enforcement Act of 1982 had not been enacted.

July 24, 1982, D.C. Law 4-131, § 502, 29 DCR 2415
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-3410.
The “District of Columbia Tax Enforcement Act of 1982,” referred to throughout this section, is D.C. Law 4-131.